Utah statutes.
53A-11-303.   Regulations of department.
(1)  The Department of Health shall adopt rules to establish which
immunizations are required and the manner and frequency of their
administration.
(2)  The rules adopted shall conform to recognized standard medical practices.
(3)  The rules shall require the reporting of statistical information and
names of noncompliers by the schools.
